Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1967
Voting agreements.

(a) Two or more members may provide for the manner in which they will vote by signing an agreement for that purpose. Such agreements may be valid for a period of up to ten years. For public benefit corporations such agreements must have a reasonable purpose not inconsistent with the corporation's public or charitable purposes.

(b) A voting agreement created under this section is specifically enforceable.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 67.